Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-943
University of
Nebraska; associate degree, diploma, and certificate; programs authorized; conditions;
exception.

The University of Nebraska may continue
to offer the associate degree, diploma, and certificate in agriculturally
related fields, radiologic technology, radiation therapy, nuclear medicine
technology, and engineering technology if approved by the Coordinating Commission
for Postsecondary Education pursuant to sections 85-1413 and 85-1414 upon
the demonstration of a compelling need and unique capacity by the university
to offer such programs. The University of Nebraska shall not offer associate
degrees or less than associate-degree-level diplomas or certificates in other than authorized and approved
programs. If approved by the
Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education pursuant to sections 85-1413
and 85-1414, the University of Nebraska may offer certificates within fields
in addition to those specified in this section if the preponderance of courses
comprising those certificates are above the associate-degree level.

Laws 1978, LB 756, § 27;

Laws 1988, LB 890, § 1;

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 91;

Laws 2003, LB 7, § 3;

Laws 2011, LB637, § 27.